Wisconsin, session 2025, SB850.
do enact as follows:SB850,11Section 1. 125.09 (1) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB850,2,52125.09 (1) (e) Whether a venue, location, property, open space, room, or 3establishment is a public place for purposes of this subsection has no effect on 4whether it is a public or private place for purposes of ch. 101, any zoning ordinance, 5or any other provision of law.SB850,21Section 2. 125.24 (1) (a) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 73, 2is amended to read:SB850,3,73125.24 (1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the division may 4issue to property owners no-sale event venue permits that authorize the permittee 5to rent or lease real property for use as an event venue at which fermented malt 6beverages and wine alcohol beverages are consumed if all requirements under this 7section are satisfied.SB850,38Section 3. 125.24 (1) (d) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 73, 9is amended to read:SB850,3,1410125.24 (1) (d) Subject to par. (f) and sub. (2) (c) 3., a permit may not be issued 11under this section for premises that are covered by any other license or permit 12under this chapter, but a caterer holding Class “B” and “Class B” licenses may 13deliver fermented malt beverages and wine alcohol beverages to the event venue if 14all requirements under sub. (2) are satisfied.SB850,415Section 4. 125.24 (1) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB850,3,2116125.24 (1) (f) If an applicant for a no-sale event venue permit holds a retail 17license prohibited under par. (d) at the time of the application, the applicant may 18certify that the applicant will surrender the retail license upon issuance of a permit 19under this section. If the division issues a permit under this section and the 20applicant fails to surrender the retail license, the division may revoke under s. 21125.12 (5) the permit issued under this section.SB850,522Section 5. 125.24 (2) (a) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 73, 23is amended to read:SB850,4,624125.24 (2) (a) A no-sale event venue permit authorizes the permittee to rent 1or lease real property for use as an event venue at which fermented malt beverages 2and wine alcohol beverages are consumed on at no more than 6 days 36 events per 3calendar year and no more than one day per month, with each event having a 4duration no longer than a continuous 36-hour period during which the permittee 5has rented or leased the event venue to the same renter or lessee for the entire 6period.SB850,67Section 6. 125.24 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 873, is renumbered 125.24 (2) (b).SB850,79Section 7. 125.24 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 1073, is repealed.SB850,811Section 8. 125.24 (2) (c) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 1273, is amended to read:SB850,4,1513125.24 (2) (c) 1. Allow the renter or lessee of the event venue to bring the 14renter’s or lessee’s own fermented malt beverages and wine alcohol beverages onto 15the event venue and serve it to guests without charge.SB850,916Section 9. 125.24 (2) (c) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 1773, is amended to read:SB850,4,2018125.24 (2) (c) 2. Allow the guests of the renter or lessee to bring fermented 19malt beverages and wine alcohol beverages onto the event venue to be consumed by 20the guests without charge.SB850,1021Section 10. 125.24 (2) (c) 4. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 2273, is amended to read:SB850,5,223125.24 (2) (c) 4. Allow the renter or lessee to contract with a caterer holding 24Class “B” and “Class B” licenses for the caterer to provide fermented malt beverages 1and wine alcohol beverages to the renter or lessee and the renter’s or lessee’s guests 2without charge on the event venue.SB850,113Section 11. 125.24 (2) (d) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 473, is amended to read:SB850,5,85125.24 (2) (d) 2. The caterer may serve the fermented malt beverages and 6wine alcohol beverages that are provided on the event venue, but service shall be 7performed only by persons holding an operator’s license under s. 125.17 or 8operator’s permit under s. 125.175.SB850,129Section 12. 125.24 (2) (d) 3. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 1073, is amended to read:SB850,5,1411125.24 (2) (d) 3. The caterer may not provide fermented malt beverages or 12wine alcohol beverages on the event venue unless the renter or lessee has first 13purchased the fermented malt beverages or wine alcohol beverages from the caterer 14in a face-to-face transaction at the caterer’s licensed retail premises.SB850,1315Section 13. 125.24 (2) (e) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 1673, is repealed.SB850,1417Section 14. 125.24 (2) (e) 3. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 1873, is amended to read:SB850,5,2219125.24 (2) (e) 3. If there are 20 or more people on the event venue, allow the 20service of fermented malt beverages or wine alcohol beverages unless the service is 21performed by a person holding an operator’s license under s. 125.17 or operator’s 22permit under s. 125.175.SB850,1523Section 15. Effective date.SB850,6,21(1) This act takes effect on January 1, 2026, or on the day after publication, 2whichever is later.SB850,6,33